Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 10 State Board of Insurance Agent Examiners

§ 26-10-101.
“Board” defined. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 199; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-199; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 26-10-102.
Composition; appointment; qualifications and terms of members; ex officio member; removal; vacancies. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 234, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-200; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 200; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 26-10-103.
Officers; meetings; quorum. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 234, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-201; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 201; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 26-10-104.
Powers and authority of board; examinations; records. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 202; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-202; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1987, ch. 36, § 1; 2001, ch. 201, § 2; repealed by 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 26-10-105.
Commissioner to cooperate with board. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 203; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-203; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 26-10-106.
Compensation and expenses. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 234, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-204; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 204; 1973, ch. 179, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1975, ch. 165, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 26-10-107.
Account; disbursement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 234, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-205; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 205; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1975, ch. 164, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1987, ch. 36, § 1; 1993, ch. 97, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 26-10-108.
Board's accounts and report. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 234, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-206; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 206; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 26-10-109.
Judicial review. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 234, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-207; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 207; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.